Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.162, is amended to read: 124D.162 KINDERGARTEN ENTRY ASSESSMENT. Subdivision 1. Assessment required. The commissioner of education must implement a kindergarten entry assessment of incoming kindergartners to identify the percent of kindergartners who meet or exceed end-of-year prekindergarten early learning standards. Subd. 2. Process. (a) deleted text begin School districts and charter schools must choose a kindergarten entry assessment tool from a menudeleted text end new text begin The commissioner must identify a selectionnew text end of valid and reliable measurement instruments approved by the department that: (1) are aligned to the state early childhood indicators of progress and kindergarten standards and are based on the criteria to be an early learning assessment approved by the department; (2) support the comprehensive achievement and civic readiness goals in section 120B.11, subdivision 1, paragraph (c); deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) are based, in part, on information collected from teachers, early learning professionals, families, and other partnersdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) are aligned to the tools used for screening under section 120B.12. new text end (b) The department must provide technical assistance and professional development related to the assessment required under this section to educators, school districts, and charter schools. new text begin (c) The requirements under section 16C.08 do not apply to the selection of tools under this section. new text end Subd. 3. Reporting. School districts and charter schools must annually report the results of kindergarten entry assessments to the department in a form and manner determined by the commissioner that is concurrent with a district's and charter school's comprehensive achievement and civic readiness report under section 120B.11, subdivision 5. The commissioner must publicly report kindergarten readiness results as part of the performance reports required under section 120B.36 and in a manner consistent with section 120B.35, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (2). Subd. 4. Implementation. The requirements under this section must be phased in over three school years with all school districts and charter schools complying beginning with the deleted text begin 2025-2026deleted text end new text begin 2026-2027new text end school year. Sec. 2. new text begin EARLY CHILDHOOD LITERACY PILOT PROGRAMS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of education. new text end new text begin (c) "Structured literacy" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.119, subdivision 15. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Expert panel. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must convene an expert panel to review literacy research and make recommendations for improving early childhood literacy. The expert panel must be made up of: new text end new text begin (1) state and national experts in structured literacy, including but not limited to researchers and practitioners; and new text end new text begin (2) experts in developmentally appropriate practice, assessment, curriculum, professional development, and family engagement, including but not limited to researchers who have studied literacy for early education, early educators, caregivers, family advocates, and individuals from organizations working in support of young children's education and development. new text end new text begin (b) The expert panel must review original research and reports related to early childhood literacy and identify solutions based on structured literacy that support whole child development in the areas of: new text end new text begin (1) family engagement; new text end new text begin (2) curricula; new text end new text begin (3) professional development; new text end new text begin (4) instructional practices; and new text end new text begin (5) assessment practices and tiered intervention models. new text end new text begin (c) The expert panel must make recommendations to the commissioner on practices in the areas specified in paragraph (b) for inclusion in pilot programs under this section. The expert panel must recommend practices that are evidence-based or that the panel agrees warrant testing as part of a pilot program. The full set of recommendations must be designed to improve outcomes in the kindergarten entry assessment under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.162. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Pilot programs. new text end new text begin (a) To the extent funding is available, the commissioner must implement pilot programs based on the recommendations of the expert panel. new text end new text begin (b) To the extent practicable, the commissioner must implement the pilot programs required under this section in different early care and learning settings, including in public school prekindergarten programs, Head Start programs, licensed family child care settings, licensed child care centers, and children's home environments. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Evaluation. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must contract with an independent research organization to develop and implement an evaluation of the pilot programs required under this section to determine each program's effectiveness in showing growth on measures of literacy outcomes for children in preschool and early elementary grades. new text end new text begin (b) During the evaluation, children's prereading skills must be measured using assessments that have been validated as predictive of future reading performance, including but not limited to measurement conducted as part of required screening under Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.12. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Annual and comprehensive reviews. new text end new text begin (a) Each year a pilot program is in effect, the commissioner must convene a public meeting to: new text end new text begin (1) review each implemented pilot program's successes and barriers; new text end new text begin (2) review the results of evaluations required under this section; and new text end new text begin (3) make recommendations to improve implementation of the pilot programs and each program's efficacy. new text end new text begin (b) Each public meeting must include legislators, members of the expert panel, pilot program participants, and evaluators. new text end new text begin (c) In addition to convening the annual review meetings, the commissioner must examine initial and long-term outcome evaluation results required under this section across all developmental domains within the state's early childhood indicators of progress. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Recommendations. new text end new text begin By February 1, 2029, the commissioner must submit to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over early childhood education recommendations for implementing, on a larger scale, proven approaches for improving early childhood literacy based on the results of the pilot programs implemented under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Coordination with the commissioner of children, youth, and families. new text end new text begin The commissioner must work in coordination with the commissioner of children, youth, and families to carry out the requirements of this section. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Early childhood literacy pilot programs. new text end new text begin (a) For implementation, evaluation, and review of early childhood literacy pilot programs: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end